Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.683

Member with terminal illness—Removal from system.

(1) Upon application of the member, a member who is diagnosed with a terminal illness shall be removed from membership in the system subject to the following conditions:

(a) That the medical adviser, after a medical examination of the member made by or under the direction of the medical adviser, has certified in writing that the member has a terminal illness with a life expectancy of five or fewer years; and

(b) That the director concurs in the recommendation of the medical adviser.

(2) Members removed from the system shall not make contributions toward a defined contribution account as defined in chapter 41.34 RCW and shall not accumulate additional service credit.

(3) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to this benefit not granted prior to that amendment or repeal.

[ 2005 c 131 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 131: See note following RCW 41.40.823.